Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,122
Violations by corporation; penalty.

Any corporation convicted for violation of section 44-3,120 shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars.

Laws 1969, c. 352, § 4, p. 1232.